Massachusetts, session 194th, S455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (c) of section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking in line 44 the number “4” and inserting in
place thereof the number “3”; and further by striking in line 79 the number “4” and inserting in
place thereof the number “3”.
of 1